Louisiana, session 2026, HB443.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:312(1)(b) and 312.1(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§312. Courts of appeal; circuits and districts
There shall be five court of appeal circuits, which shall be subdivided into
districts as follows:
1.
* * *
(b) Districts of first circuit. (i) The parishes of Ascension, Assumption,
Iberville, Lafourche, Pointe Coupee, St. Mary, Terrebonne, and West Baton Rouge
shall compose the first district of the first circuit. The first district shall be further
divided into two election sections.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-225 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 443
(aa) Election section one shall be composed of Ascension Parish,
Assumption Parish, Iberville Parish, Pointe Coupee Parish, and West Baton Rouge
Parish.
(bb) Election section two shall be composed of Lafourche Parish, St. Mary
Parish, and Terrebonne Parish.
(ii) The parish of East Baton Rouge shall compose the second district of the
first circuit. The second district shall be further divided into two election sections.
(aa) Election section one is composed of Precincts 1-8, 1-12, 1-34, 1-35,
1-39, 1-40, 1-41, 1-42, 1-43, 1-47, 1-48, 1-49, 1-56, 1-59, 1-64, 1-65, 1-66, 1-69,
1-73, 1-74, 1-75, 1-76, 1-79, 1-80, 1-89, 1-97, 1-98, 1-99, 1-105, 1-106, 1-107, 2-6,
2-7, 2-8, 2-33, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 3-9, 3-10, 3-12, 3-13, 3-14, 3-15,
3-16, 3-17, 3-18, 3-19, 3-20, 3-21, 3-22, 3-23, 3-25, 3-26, 3-29, 3-30, 3-31, 3-32,
3-33, 3-34, 3-35, 3-36, 3-37, 3-38, 3-39, 3-40, 3-41, 3-43, 3-44, 3-45, 3-46, 3-47,
3-48, 3-49, 3-50, 3-51, 3-52, 3-53, 3-54, 3-55, 3-56, 3-57, 3-58, 3-59, 3-60, 3-61,
3-62, 3-63, 3-64, 3-65, 3-66, 3-67, 3-68, 3-69, 3-70, 3-71, 3-72, 3-73, 3-74, 3-75, and
3-76 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(bb) Election section two is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5,
1-6, 1-7, 1-9, 1-10, 1-11, 1-13, 1-14, 1-15, 1-16, 1-18, 1-19, 1-20, 1-21, 1-22, 1-23,
1-24, 1-25, 1-26, 1-27, 1-28, 1-29, 1-30, 1-31, 1-32, 1-33, 1-36, 1-37, 1-38, 1-44,
1-45, 1-46, 1-50, 1-51, 1-52, 1-53, 1-54, 1-55, 1-57, 1-58, 1-60, 1-61, 1-62, 1-63,
1-67, 1-70, 1-71, 1-72, 1-77, 1-78, 1-81, 1-82, 1-83, 1-84, 1-85, 1-86, 1-87, 1-88,
1-90, 1-91, 1-92, 1-93, 1-94, 1-95, 1-96, 1-100, 1-101, 1-102, 1-103, 1-104, 2-1, 2-2,
2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 2-13, 2-14, 2-15, 2-16, 2-17, 2-18, 2-19, 2-20,
2-21, 2-22, 2-23, 2-24, 2-25, 2-26, 2-27, 2-28, 2-29, 2-30, 2-31, 2-32, 2-34, 2-35,
2-36, 2-37, 2-38, 3-8, 3-11, 3-24, 3-27, 3-28, and 3-42 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(iii) The parishes of East Feliciana, Livingston, St. Helena, St. Tammany,
Tangipahoa, Washington, and West Feliciana shall compose the third district of the
first circuit.
* * *
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-225 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 443
§312.1. Circuit court of appeal; domicile; number of judges; election
A.(1) The Court of Appeal for the First Circuit, domiciled in the city of
Baton Rouge, shall have twelve judges. Four judges shall be elected from each of
the three districts composing the circuit by the qualified electors of each district,
respectively.
(2) However, in In the first district, one judge, Division C, shall be elected
from election section one by the qualified electors of election section one, and one
judge, Division A, shall be elected from election section two by the qualified electors
of election section two. The remaining two judges in the first district, Divisions B
and D, shall be elected by the qualified electors of the entire first district.
(3) In the second district, two judges, Divisions A and B, shall be elected
from election section one by the qualified electors of election section one, and two
judges, Divisions C and D, shall be elected from election section two by the qualified
electors of election section two.
* * *
Section 2.(A) Each judge of the second district in office on the effective date of this
Act shall be the judge for the division to which he was elected and may complete the term
for which he was elected.
(B)(1) The successor to the office of a judge of the second district shall be elected
from the election section to which the division is assigned as provided by R.S. 13:312.1.
The election shall be from the election section composed as provided by R.S. 13:312.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, there shall be no
requirement that a judge be a resident of the election section from which he is elected;
however, the judge shall be a resident of the second district of the Court of Appeal for the
First Circuit, in accordance with law.
Section 3.(A) The precincts referenced in this Act are those contained in the file
named "2026 Precinct Shapefiles (01-27-2026)" available on the website of the Legislature
of Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles are based
upon those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-225 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 443
Shapefiles for the State of Louisiana as those filed have been modified and validated through
the data verification program of the Louisiana House of Representatives and the Louisiana
Senate to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026, to the Legislature
of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 18:532 and
532.1.
(B) When a precinct referenced in this Act has been subdivided by action of the
parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action of the parish
governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
18:532.1, the enumeration in this Act of the general precinct designation shall include all
nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such subdivisions may be
designated.
(C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in this Act shall continue in
effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the precincts by
the parish governing authority.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.